Maryland, session 2026, HB1036.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
6–605.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SERIOUS PHYSICAL INJURY” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 3–201 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(B) IF A PERSON DIES OR SUSTAINS SERIOUS PHYSICAL INJURY IN
CONNECTION WITH AN INTERACTION WITH FEDERAL LAW ENFORCEMENT OR
FEDERAL IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT, THE DIVISION SHALL INVESTIGATE THE
DEATH OR SERIOUS PHYSICAL INJURY.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1036*

HOUSE BILL 1036
(C) AFTER CONDUCTING AN INVESTIGATION UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION, THE DIVISION SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SETTING
FORTH THE FINDINGS OF THE INVESTIGATION.
(D) IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL DETERMINES THAT AN INVESTIGATION
CONDUCTED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION PROVIDES SUFFICIENT
GROUNDS FOR PROSECUTION OF A FEDERAL LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER OR A
FEDERAL IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT OFFICER FOR THE COMMISSION OF A
CRIME, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL PROSECUTE THE CASE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.